Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2558.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 20, chapter 4, article 3, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-841.14, to read: START_STATUTE20-841.14. Cancer; chemotherapy; scalp cooling system; definition A. Beginning January 1, 2027, a hospital service corporation or medical service corporation that issues, amends, delivers or renews a subscription contract that provides coverage for cancer-related chemotherapy treatment shall also provide coverage for a scalp cooling system that is used in connection with the cancer-related chemotherapy treatment. B. For the purposes of this section, "Scalp cooling system" means a device that is used to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce hair loss during cancer-related chemotherapy treatment, if the device is designed and intended for repeated use and is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 20, chapter 4, article 9, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-1057.21, to read: START_STATUTE20-1057.21. Cancer; chemotherapy; scalp cooling system; definition A. Beginning January 1, 2027, a health care services organization that issues, amends, delivers or renews an evidence of coverage for cancer-related chemotherapy treatment shall also provide coverage for a scalp cooling system that is used in connection with the cancer-related chemotherapy treatment. B. For the purposes of this section, "Scalp cooling system" means a device that is used to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce hair loss during cancer-related chemotherapy treatment, if the device is designed and intended for repeated use and is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Title 20, chapter 6, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-1376.11, to read: START_STATUTE20-1376.11. Cancer; chemotherapy; scalp cooling system; definition A. Beginning January 1, 2027, a disability insurer that issues, amends, delivers or renews a policy that provides coverage for cancer-related chemotherapy treatment shall also provide coverage for a scalp cooling system that is used in connection with the cancer-related chemotherapy treatment. B. For the purposes of this section, "Scalp cooling system" means a device that is used to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce hair loss during cancer-related chemotherapy treatment, if the device is designed and intended for repeated use and is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Title 20, chapter 6, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 20-1406.11, to read: START_STATUTE20-1406.11. Cancer; chemotherapy; scalp cooling system; definition A. Beginning January 1, 2027, a group or blanket disability insurer that issues, amends, delivers or renews a policy that provides coverage for cancer-related chemotherapy treatment shall also provide coverage for a scalp cooling system that is used in connection with the cancer-related chemotherapy treatment. B. For the purposes of this section, "Scalp cooling system" means a device that is used to cool the human scalp to prevent or reduce hair loss during cancer-related chemotherapy treatment, if the device is designed and intended for repeated use and is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose. END_STATUTE